Wyoming, session 2025, HB0290.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

HB0290

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0626
Section 1. W.S. 39-11-105(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlvi), 39-15-104 by creating a new subsection
(j), 39-15-111(b)(intro) and by creating a new subsection
(r), 39-16-104 by creating a new subsection (g) and
39-16-111(b)(intro) are amended to read:

39-11-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following property is exempt from property
taxation:

(xlvi) A portion of the fair market value of
single family residential properties. This exemption shall
only apply to property owners that reside in the single
family residential property not less than six (6) months of
the year for which the exemption is claimed. The following
shall apply to the exemption under this paragraph:

(A) The amount of the exemption under this
paragraph shall be the first two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000.00) of fair market value of the single family
residential property in tax year 2025 and the first one
million dollars ($1,000,000.00) of fair market value of the
HB0290

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0626
single family residential property for each tax year
thereafter. The amount of the exemption under this
subparagraph shall be inflated on an annual basis beginning
in tax year 2027 from one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)
by the rate of inflation determined by the department using
the consumer price index or its successor index of the
United States department of labor, bureau of labor
statistics or two percent (2%), whichever is less;

(B) The department shall adopt rules
necessary to administer the exemption under this paragraph;

(C) As used in this paragraph, "single
family residential property" means a structure intended for
human habitation, including a house, modular home, mobile
home, townhouse or condominium that is a privately owned
single family dwelling unit and includes a detached garage
and the associated residential improved land if the land is
owned by the owner of the dwelling.

39-15-104. Taxation rate.

HB0290

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0626
(j) In addition to the sales tax under subsections
(a) and (b) of this section, and subject to the provisions
of W.S. 39-15-111(r)(ii), beginning July 1, 2025 there is
imposed an additional sales tax as provided in this
subsection. The additional sales tax imposed under this
subsection shall not apply to sales to industrial
facilities as defined by W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii) that are
subject to permitting by the industrial siting council
under W.S. 35-12-101 through 35-12-119 during the period of
permitting and construction of the industrial facility. The
revenue from the tax under this subsection shall be
distributed as provided in W.S. 39-15-111(r). The rate of
the sales tax under this subsection shall be determined as
follows:

(i) Except as provided in paragraph (ii) or
(iii) of this subsection, the rate of the additional tax
shall be two percent (2%), which shall be administered as
if the sales tax rate under subsections (a) and (b) of this
section was increased from four percent (4%) to six percent
(6%);

HB0290

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0626
(ii) The additional rate specified under
paragraph (i) of this subsection may be reduced in
intervals of one quarter of one percent (0.25%) if the
governor certifies to the department that the amount of the
tax together with funds in the property tax reduction and
replacement account are sufficient to provide all payments
under W.S. 39-15-111(r)(i);

(iii) The additional rate specified under
paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be reduced by the
department to zero percent (0%) if for any reason the
exemption under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi) is unavailable for
that tax year.

39-15-111. Distribution.

(b) Revenues earned under W.S. 39-15-104 during each
fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that
fiscal year for accounting purposes. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection subsections (p) and (r) of this
section, for all revenue collected by the department under
W.S. 39-15-104 the department shall:

HB0290

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0626
(r) An amount equal to the tax revenue collected that
is attributable to the tax under W.S. 39-15-104(j) and
39-16-104(g) shall be transferred to the property tax
reduction and replacement account, which is hereby created.
All funds within the account shall be invested by the state
treasurer as provided by law and all investment earnings
from the account shall be credited to the account. An
amount in the account equal to the tax revenue collected
that is attributable to the tax under W.S. 39-15-104(j) and
39-16-104(g) from January 1 of each year through December
31 of each year shall be distributed as follows:

(i) An amount determined under this paragraph to
each county, to be distributed by county treasurers in the
same manner property taxes are distributed as provided in
W.S. 39-13-111(a)(i). On or before September 1, county
treasurers shall certify to the department the exemptions
granted under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi). If the amount
available to distribute under this subsection is
insufficient to fully reimburse each county and
governmental entity in the county as provided in this
paragraph, the amount provided to each county shall be
proportionally reduced based on the amount of revenue
HB0290

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0626
available. The amount calculated for each county shall be
determined and distributed not later than February 15 of
each year based on the amount of revenue that the county
and each governmental entity within the county lost in the
immediately preceding year as a result of the property tax
exemption under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi). Beginning January
1, 2026, the amount calculated for a county under this
paragraph shall not include any amount for mills that are
assessed for the repayment of bonds;

(ii) Any amount remaining after the
distributions in paragraph (i) of this subsection shall
remain in the property tax reduction and replacement
account. The legislature shall annually review the amounts
in the account and shall consider using any funds in the
account for direct distributions to local governments.

39-16-104. Taxation rate.

(g) In addition to the use tax under subsections (a)
and (b) of this section, and subject to the provisions of
W.S. 39-15-111(r), beginning July 1, 2025 there is imposed
an additional use tax as provided in this subsection. The
HB0290

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0626
additional use tax imposed under this subsection shall not
apply to purchases by industrial facilities as defined by
W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii) that are subject to permitting by
the industrial siting council under W.S. 35-12-101 through
35-12-119 during the period of permitting and construction
of the industrial facility. The revenue from the tax under
this subsection shall be distributed as provided in W.S.
39-15-111(r). The rate of the use tax under this subsection
shall be determined as follows:

(i) Except as provided in paragraph (ii) or
(iii) of this subsection, the rate of the additional tax
shall be two percent (2%), which shall be administered as
if the use tax rate under subsections (a) and (b) of this
section was increased from four percent (4%) to six percent
(6%);

(ii) The additional rate specified under
paragraph (i) of this subsection may be reduced in
intervals of one quarter of one percent (0.25%) if the
governor certifies to the department that the amount of the
tax together with funds in the property tax reduction and
HB0290

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0626
replacement account are sufficient to provide all payments
under W.S. 39-15-111(r)(i);

(iii) The additional rate specified under
paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be reduced by the
department to zero percent (0%) if for any reason the
exemption under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi) is unavailable for
any tax year.

39-16-111. Distribution.

(b) Revenues earned under this article during each
fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that
fiscal year for accounting purposes. Except as provided in
W.S. 39-15-111(r) for revenue attributable to the tax under
W.S. 39-16-104(g), revenue collected by the department from
the taxes imposed by this article shall be transferred to
the state treasurer who shall, as specified by the
department:

Section 2. The department of revenue shall adopt
rules necessary to implement this act not later than July
1, 2025.
HB0290

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0626

Section 3. The property tax exemption provided by
W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xlvi), as created by section 1 of this
act, shall first apply to the tax year beginning January 1,
2025.

Section 4.

(a) If 2025 Senate File 48, 2025 Senate file 49 or
both are enacted into law, the department of revenue shall:

(i) In consultation with the county treasurers,
determine, to the extent practicable, the reduction in
revenues to local governments as a result of the tax
exemption that is amended in 2025 Senate File 48 and the
revision to the valuation of personal property in 2025
Senate File 49. Any reduction in revenues determined under
this paragraph shall, to the extent funds are available, be
reimbursed to counties in the same manner as provided in
W.S. 39-15-111(r)(i), as created by section 1 of this act;

(ii) Report to the joint revenue interim
committee any recommended statutory changes necessary to
HB0290

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0626
include any revenue reductions as a result of 2025 Senate
File 48 or 2025 Senate File 49 in the reimbursement to
counties under W.S. 39-15-111(r)(i). The recommendations
shall include any necessary reporting requirements from
counties or taxpayers to enable the calculation of revenue
reductions. The report under this paragraph shall be
provided not later than August 1, 2025.

Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0290